Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-1255
Flying lantern-type devices; prohibited acts; penalty.

(1) Flying lantern-type devices are prohibited from sale, possession, and use in this state.

(2) For purposes of this section, flying lantern-type devices means devices that require a flame which produces heated air trapped in a balloon-type covering allowing the device to float in the air. Flying lantern-type devices shall not include hot-air balloons used for transporting persons.

(3) A violation of this section is a Class V misdemeanor.

Laws 2016, LB136, § 2.